Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5511.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 46-15 of the General Laws entitled "Water Resources Management"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
46-15-24. Public water system's obligations – Jamestown.
The commissioners of the water and sewer commission for the town of Jamestown may
specifically limit its public water system's obligation to supply water only to those applicants who
reside within its designated and described service area as opposed to the entire land area of the
town.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001509
========